Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1277.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 17-298.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE17-298.01. Decennial performance audit Beginning in 2001 and every tenth succeeding year thereafter, the auditor general shall conduct a performance audit, as defined in section 41-1278, of the programs and expenditures of the Arizona game and fish commission heritage fund pursuant to this article. The auditor general shall submit copies of the performance audit to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the chairmen chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives committees on natural resources and agriculture, or their successor committees. END_STATUTE